Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GLOBAL COMPETENCY SKILLS PILOT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grant. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to a nonprofit organization to develop a pilot program to train students in global competency skills: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The grant applicant must provide programming to train students at multiple sites statewide in the global competency skills necessary for future workforce competitiveness, including critical thinking, collaboration, comfort with unfamiliar situations, and forming opinions based on evidence. The grant recipient may use grant money for program costs, including teacher training, curriculum development, and support to participating schools. new text end new text begin (c) The grant recipient must document and obtain a minimum 25 percent nonstate match for any grant award. new text end new text begin (d) An organization must apply for a grant in the form and manner established by the commissioner of education. new text end new text begin (e) By June 30, 2026, and each year annually through June 30, 2029, the grant recipient must report on the outcomes of its global competency skills program to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education. The report must be submitted in compliance with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. The report must summarize demographic and geographic information about program participants and analyze measures of effectiveness of the global competency skills training program. new text end new text begin (f) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end